California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
On or before January 31, 2016, the secretary shall establish a list of handlers eligible to vote on whether they shall be subject to this chapter. In establishing the list, the secretary may require that handlers provide receipts of the quantity of salmon received from commercial salmon vessel operators in the previous season. The secretary may also request the assistance of the Director of Fish and Wildlife in compiling the list. The request for the information shall be in writing and shall be subject to the confidentiality provisions of Section 8022 of the Fish and Game Code. The list shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 56.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76962.

Any handler whose name does not appear upon the secretary’s list of handlers may have his or her name established on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement, identifying himself or herself as a handler. Failure to be on the list does not exempt a handler from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 56.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76963.

This chapter shall not apply to handlers until the secretary finds in a referendum conducted by the secretary under this article that at least 40 percent of the total number of handlers from the list established by the secretary have participated by voting in the referendum, and the secretary finds either of the following:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of being subject to this chapter, and the handlers who voted in the referendum handled 51 percent or more of the total quantity of salmon landed in the preceding fiscal year by all the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(b) Fifty-one percent of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of being subject to this chapter, and the handlers who voted in the referendum marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of salmon landed in the preceding fiscal year by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 56.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76964.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum that shall not be more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 30 days, the secretary may extend that period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 56.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76965.

(a) Before the referendum vote is conducted by the secretary, the proponents of this article shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary determines is necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the referendum vote.

(b) Any funds not used in carrying out this article shall be returned to the proponents of this article who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon passage of the referendum, the council may reimburse the proponents of this article for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out this
 article, and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in approval of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 56.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76966.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 56.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76967.

(a) If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given, the secretary shall so certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all handlers whose names and addresses may be on file with the secretary.

(b) If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, the secretary shall so certify and declare this article inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 56.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Continuation [76971. - 76974.]

76971.

(a) Between January 1, 2019, and February 28, 2019, and in the same period each five years thereafter, the secretary shall, by the public hearing procedure, and if appropriate, the procedure specified in this article, determine whether the council program provided for in this chapter shall continue in effect.

(b) If the secretary finds from evidence received at the hearing that a substantial question exists as to whether the council program is contrary to or does not effectuate the declared purposes or provisions of this chapter or receives in writing a referendum petition with the signatures of 25 percent or more of the number of commercial salmon vessel operators who
 made landings in the previous year, as evidenced by receipts prepared under Section 8043 of the Fish and Game Code, and, if applicable, 25 percent or more of the handlers who are subject to this chapter, the council program shall be submitted to referendum as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 57.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76972.

If the secretary determines that a referendum procedure is appropriate, the secretary shall establish a referendum period of not to exceed 30 days during which period ballots shall be submitted to every commercial salmon vessel operator and, if applicable, every handler subject to this chapter on a statewide basis. If the secretary determines that the referendum period does not provide sufficient time for the balloting, the secretary may extend the referendum for an additional period not to exceed 30 days. The ballots shall provide a “yes” or “no” voting alternative to the following question: “Shall the California Salmon Council be continued for the next five fiscal years commencing April 1, following this referendum?”

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 57.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76973.

If the council program is submitted to a referendum as provided in this article, the secretary shall find that commercial salmon vessel operators and, if applicable, handlers subject to this chapter statewide have approved the council program if the secretary finds either of the following:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the total number of commercial salmon vessel operators and handlers, who voted in the referendum and who harvested 51 percent or more of the total amount of salmon landed during the previous fiscal year by all commercial salmon vessel operators and handlers who voted in the referendum, approve the program.

(b) Fifty-one percent or more of the total number of commercial salmon vessel operators and handlers, who voted in the review referendum and who harvested 65 percent or more of the total amount of salmon landed during the previous fiscal year by all commercial salmon vessel operators and handlers who voted in the review referendum, approve the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 57.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76974.

(a) This chapter shall continue if commercial salmon vessel operators and handlers vote for continuation in accordance with the requirements of this article.

(b) This chapter shall not continue in operation if commercial salmon vessel operators and handlers vote not to continue in accordance with the requirements of this article.

(c) If commercial salmon vessel operators vote for continuation and handlers do not vote for continuation, or if handlers vote for continuation and commercial salmon vessel operators do not vote for continuation, this chapter shall continue to be operative for the group voting for
 continuation and shall no longer apply to the group voting against continuation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 57.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Termination [76981. - 76981.]

76981.

If the commercial salmon vessel operators and the handlers vote to terminate the council pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 76971), the council shall remain in existence for the purpose of furnishing the secretary with a complete record of its outstanding financial obligations, accrued and to accrue. The secretary shall pay from the money deposited and disbursed any outstanding obligations and any obligations incurred by the secretary and the department under the terms and provisions of this section. Any money that remains shall be retained by the secretary to defray the expenses of formulation, issuance, administration, or enforcement of any subsequent program for salmon promotion. If no such program is undertaken within a period
 of three years from the date of termination of the council, that money shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into the special account for enhancement and restoration programs established pursuant to Section 7861 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 307, Sec. 58.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16.5. California Walnut Commission [77001. - 77195.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [77001. - 77008.]

77001.

The production and handling of walnuts constitute an important industry of this state. This industry not only provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens, but also furnishes essential food vital to the public health and welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77002.

The maintenance and expansion of the walnut industry of California is necessary to ensure the consuming public of a continuous supply of this vital food and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those engaged in the walnut industry of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

77003.

It is necessary for human nutrition and public benefit that the public be made aware of accurate and scientific information relative to the beneficial qualities of walnuts and of the production and distribution costs necessary to make walnuts available to the consuming public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77003.5.

The establishment of the commission is necessary for the efficient development and management of a national and international advertising and promotion program that will enhance the reputation of the California walnut industry, create a more receptive environment for the industry and its products, and increase competitiveness of the California walnut industry within the national and international marketplace. The commission is necessary to carry out the California walnut industry’s commitment to responsible stewardship and increasingly efficient cultural practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

77003.6.

The successes that the walnut industry of California have enjoyed have come about in part through a commitment to industry-funded research that has led to significant improvements in the quality of the walnuts available to consumers and increasingly efficient cultural practices resulting in increased awareness of, and a more receptive environment for, the production and handling of walnuts in domestic and foreign markets. It has also led to walnuts being a better consumer value. The establishment of the commission will maintain and enhance this research effort and make it possible for the walnut industry to realize its potential, resulting in increased consumer value and enhanced producer returns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77004.

The production and handling of walnuts produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77005.

No action taken by the commission, nor by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Fair Trade Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16900) of that Part 2), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1700) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77006.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77007.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77007.5.

Opportunity exists for continued growth and expansion of the walnut industry by creating new markets. The success of that expansion program is uniquely dependent upon effective advertising, promotion, and research since the creation of new markets is essentially a matter of educating and informing people of the use, nutritional value, and availability of the commodity and enhancing the reputation of the California walnut industry. The expansion of the walnut industry also provides an important source of jobs for many people in this state, a high proportion of whom reside in historically depressed areas of the state, and serves to ensure the preservation of an agrarian society.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

77008.

The commission form of administration created by this chapter is uniquely situated to provide those engaged in the production of walnuts the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in the broad fields of development, maintenance, and expansion of markets, advertising, promotion, marketing research, public information and education, and production and processing research necessary to achieve the purposes stated in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [77021. - 77034.]

77021.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77022.

“Walnuts” means only walnuts of the English (Juglans regia) varieties grown in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77023.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77024.

“Commission” means the California Walnut Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77026.

“Handle” or “handling” means to market, pack, sell, consign, transport, or ship, except as a common or contract carrier of walnuts owned by another person, or in any other way place walnuts, inshell or shelled, into commerce either within the area of production or from the area of production to any other point outside thereof, or for a manufacturer or retailer within the area of production to purchase directly from a producer. “Handle” or “handling” does not include sales and deliveries within the area of production by producers to handlers, or between handlers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 6.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77027.

(a) The districts consist of the following:

(1) District 1 consists of the counties in the state that lie north of a line drawn on the south boundaries of the Counties of San Mateo, Alameda, San Joaquin, Calaveras, and Alpine.

(2) District 2 consists of all other walnut producing counties in the state south of the boundary line set forth in paragraph (1).

(b) The boundaries of any district may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the full commission, which is concurred in by the secretary, when necessary to maintain similar total production among the districts and to ensure proper representation by producers. These boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77028.

“Handler” means any person who handles inshell or shelled walnuts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 7.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77029.

“Pack” means to bleach, clean, grade, shell, or otherwise prepare walnuts for market as inshell or shelled walnuts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 8.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77030.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the marketing of walnuts in domestic or foreign markets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

77031.

“Marketing year” or “fiscal year” means the period from August 1 of any year to July 31, inclusive, of the next year. Beginning September 1, 2008, “marketing year” or “fiscal year” means the period from September 1 of any year to August 31, inclusive, of the next year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 9.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77031.5.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, limited liability partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other association or entity doing business in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

77032.

“Producer” means any person in this state who grows walnuts for market and who, upon request, provides proof of commodity sale. “Producer” does not include any person who handles 2,000 pounds or less of walnuts during a market year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 10.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77033.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77034.

“Advertising and sales promotion” means, in addition to its ordinarily accepted meaning, any plan directed toward increasing the sale of walnuts in domestic or foreign markets. No advertising or sales promotion plan shall make use of false or unwarranted claims on behalf of any product, or disparage the quality, value, sales, or use of any other commodity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Walnut Commission [77051. - 77069.]

77051.

(a) There is in state government the California Walnut Commission. The commission shall be composed of eight walnut producers who are not handlers, four walnut handlers, and one public member.

(b) Eight producer members, four from each district, shall be elected by producers. In accordance with procedures adopted by the commission, no more than two producers from each district who ship the largest percentage of their walnuts in the preceding marketing year to the same handler may be elected to the commission as members. Producers who ship to two or more handlers in equal percentages shall declare which handler they are affiliated with, for purposes of this section. No producer member shall be connected in a proprietary capacity with a handler.

(c) In accordance with procedures adopted by the commission, four handler members shall be elected on a weighted basis by all handlers to serve on the commission. No handler member shall be connected in a proprietary capacity or in any other manner with any other handler member serving on the commission.

(d) The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission.

(e) The secretary and other appropriate individuals as determined by the commission shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 124, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

77052.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease these activities or functions or to make corrections required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Actions of the commission in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter and the secretary’s reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions. The secretary may make recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77053.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77054.

When the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall concur, refuse to concur, or request additional information from the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77055.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, a court may, if it finds that the secretary acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 91.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77056.

Each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall have an alternate member to be elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate member shall, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate, serve in place of the member on the commission and shall have and be able to exercise all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate member shall act as a member on the commission until a qualified successor is elected or appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77057.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to the commission as a producer member or alternate producer member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by a majority vote of the remaining producer members of the commission. Any person filling a vacant producer member or alternate producer member position shall meet all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to fill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 13.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77058.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to the commission as a handler member or alternate handler member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by a majority vote of the remaining handler members of the commission. Any person filling a vacant handler member or alternate handler member position shall meet all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to fill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 14.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77059.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of the public member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission. That person shall meet all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to fill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77060.

Any producer member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall be an individual or an employee representing a producer who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, walnuts for market. The qualifications of producer members and their alternate members shall be maintained during the entire term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77061.

Any handler member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall have a financial interest in handling walnuts for market.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77062.

The public member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member or alternate member, respectively, on the commission. The public member and his or her alternate member shall not have any financial interest in the walnut industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77063.

For the 2006 marketing year, the term of office of all members of the commission, except ex officio members, shall be from the beginning of the marketing year that commences in the year of their election and until qualified successors are elected for the 2009 marketing year. Thereafter, the term of office of all members of the commission, except ex officio members, shall be two years from the beginning of the marketing year in which they are elected and until qualified successors are elected. The same selection procedure shall apply to handler members. Terms of office of each member and alternate member of the commission shall be limited to four consecutive two-year terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 18.5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

77064.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77065.

A quorum of the commission shall be eight voting members of the commission. Except as provided in Section 77027, a vote in favor of a motion by nine members present at a meeting shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 15.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77066.

The secretary or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meeting of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77067.

No member of the commission or of any committee established by the commission that may include nonmembers of the commission shall receive a salary. Except for ex officio government members, the members may receive an amount not to exceed reasonable and necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as established by the commission, for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 97, Sec. 6.   (AB 222)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

77068.

All funds received by any person from the assessments levied pursuant this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks which the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents as it may designate for that purpose. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77069.

The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is personally liable for the contracts of the commission. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually in any way to any producer, processor, handler, or any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof. Liability is several and not joint, and no member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is liable for the default of any other member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [77081. - 77102.]

77081.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of those contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77082.

The commission may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule, regulation, operating procedure, or order of the commission. The commission is exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code when acting pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77083.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, deemed reasonably necessary for the proper or advisable implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77084.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and any other officers as it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77085.

The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel, necessary to carry out this chapter. The commission may retain a management firm or the staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state or federal government to perform the functions prescribed by this section under the control of the commission.

If the person engages in any conduct which the secretary determines is not in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77086.

The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77087.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77088.

The commission may establish offices and incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary, in the opinion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77089.

The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. A summary of the audit shall be reported to all producers, copies of which shall also be submitted to the department. In addition, the secretary may, as he or she determines necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77090.

The commission may promote the sale of walnuts by brand and generic advertising and other promotional means, including tie-in advertising, for the purpose of creating, maintaining, and expanding domestic and foreign markets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

77091.

The commission may educate and instruct the wholesale and retail trade in domestic and foreign markets with respect to proper methods of handling walnuts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 16.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77092.

The commission may make market surveys and analyses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77093.

The commission may present facts to, and negotiate with, local, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters that affect the walnut industry pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

77094.
